src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
# The Livvi (Olonets) Karelian morphophonological/twolc rules file 

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

## Alphatbet, sets
**a b c č d e f g h i j k l m n o p r s š ş t u v w y z ž ƶ ü ä ö**
**A B C Č D E F G H I J K L M N O P R S Š Ş T U V W Y Z Ž Ƶ Ü Ä Ö**
**y**
**Y**
**%{aä%}:a**
**%{aä%}:ä**

 %{aoeInf%}:a	 Back vowel infinitive marker
 %{äöeInf%}:ä	 Front vowel infinitive marker

*  %{aäoeöuiy%}:ä   with partitive type koivuu
*  %{aäoeö%}:ä   newer This is for diphthongs such as the infinitive marker after i and u stems ampuo
* %{aäuyiØ%}:ä  in participle endings anticipating PÄIVY or KOIRU type

 %{ui%}:i   in imperative before %{aä%}:

**%{oö%}:o**
**%{oö%}:ö**

%{oöØ%}:0   Used in present participle

**%{uy%}:y**

 %{ijPRC%}:j  participle
*  %{lnrs%}:n   e.g. in perfect participles
*  %{dtlnr%}:d  e.g. infinitive and Ind+Prs+Pl3

this appears in the illative
**V1:a**
**V1:e**
**V1:i**
**V1:o**
**V1:u**
**V1:y**
**V1:ä**
**V1:ö**

These appear with the inessive and adessive
**V2:a**
**V2:e**
**V2:i**
**V2:o**
**V2:u**
**V2:y**
**V2:ä**
**V2:ö**

These reduplicate the preceding vowel if it in turn is preceded by a consonant
**V3:a**
**V3:e**
**V3:i**
**V3:o**
**V3:u**
**V3:y**
**V3:ä**
**V3:ö**
**V3:0**

%^DEVOICE:0    
%^VOICE:0     pestä : pezen

**%^SyllBound:0**

**%^KS2S:0**

no change
The example here is for something that should not be done
We have two infinite sets, Olonets-Karelian and incoming loanwords.
The original idea was to make a rule changing all instances of 
adjacent double aa to ua. For this reason a special trigger was
to be inserted into the lexc stem of a word to prevent such a rule
from occurring. Since the infinite Olonets-Karelian set is more predictable
and perhaps smaller than the incoming loanword set, it is better
to literally spell out adjacent vowels that are constant. 2019-09-02 JMR
%^NONE:0 This will break vowel change, e.g. sa%^NONEamelaine

%^Pen:0   pagisou paistah in combination with WGStem to trigger

%^D2Z:0	  ! The ti => zi

%^E2O:0	  the e => o, e => ö

%^Ä2I:0		  ä => i
%^A2UÄ2I:0		  a => u, ä => i

%^ILoss:0    the i => 0 **reboi reboloi**
%^V2U:0	     v => y **kävvä käydy**

_%^RVow:0   _ 
_%^RmVow:0   _ vowel removal, e.g. with superlative

Triggers dictating right context phenomena
* _%{back%}:0 _ back harmony until harmony boundary, i.e. word boundary
* _%{front%}:0 _ front harmony until harmony boundary, i.e. word boundary

### Sets

Right context for gradation

# Rules

**Rule: %{aä%}:a**
kuvitella+V+Inf: **imagine/kuvitella**
* *kuvittel%{back%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem*
* *kuvi0tel00%>la0*

**Rule: %{aä%}:ä**
ezitellä+V+Inf: **present/esitellä**
* *ezittel%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem*
* *ezi0tel00%>lä0*

**Rule: %{aäoeö%}:a**

**Rule: %{aäoeö%}:ä**
heittiä+V+Inf: **throw/heittää**
* *heittä%{front%}%>%{aäoeö%}*
* *heitti0%>ä*

**Rule: %{aäoeö%}:o**

**Rule: %{aäoeö%}:e**

**Rule: %{aäoeö%}:ö**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:a**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:ä**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:o**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:e**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:ö**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:u**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:i**

**Rule: {aäoeöuiy%}:y**

**Rule: e:0**

**Rule: %{ui%}:u**
```
* %{front%}:0  ! imperative forms
* *kanda%{back%}%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}*
* *kanda0%>kkuammo*
```

**Rule: %{ui%}:i**
```
* %{front%}:0  ! imperative forms
* *lʼykkä%{front%}%^WGStem%>kk%{ui%}%{aä%}mm%{oö%}*
* *lʼyk0ä00%>kkiämmö*
```

**Rule: %{ui%}:i**
**Rule: %{ui%}:i**
**Rule: %{ui%}:i**

**Rule: %{aäuyiØ%}:a**

**Rule: %{aäuyiØ%}:u**

**Rule: %{aäuyiØ%}:ä**

**Rule: %{aäuyiØ%}:y**

**Rule: %{aäuyiØ%}:i**

**Rule: %{aäuyiØ%}:0**

**a:u before subsequent a**  Diphthong a+a => ua
ostua+V+Inf: **buy/ostaa**

* osta%>%{aä%} examples:*

* ostu%>%{aä%} examples:*

**ä:i before subsequent A2**  Diphthong ä+ä => iä
kehittiä+V+Inf: **develop/kehittää**

* kehittä%>%{aä%} examples:*

* kehitti%>ä examples:*

**o:u before subsequent o** Diphthong o+o => uo erota:eruou

* ero%>%{oö%}%>n examples:*

* eru0o%>n examples:*

* runo%>%{oö%} examples:*

* runu%>o examples:*

* jo%>vv%{aä%} examples:*

* ju%>vva examples:*

**ö:y before subsequent ö** Diphthong ö+ö, ö+%{oö%}:ö => yö

* sö%>ö%>y examples:*

* sy%>ö%>y examples:*

* pöllö%>ö examples:*

* pölly%>ö examples:*

* sö%>vvä examples:*

* sy%>vvä examples:*

**e:i before subsequent :e** Diphthong o+o => uo erota:eruou
```

* valge%>e%^WGStem%>t examples:*

* valgi%>e00t examples:*

* hävi%>%{aäPar%}%>n examples:*

* hävi%>e0n examples:*

* tiedo%^WGStem%>n examples:*

* tiijo0%>n examples:*

* *väge%{front%}%^WGStem>n*
* *vä0i00%>n*

* luge>%{ijPRC%} examples:*

* lugi%>j examples:*

```

**e:o** Vowel harmony suffixes Back
```

* luge%^E2O%>u examples:*

* lugo%>u examples:*
```

**e:ö** Vowel harmony 

* käske%^E2O%>y examples:*

* käskö0%>y examples:*

**Rule: ä:y word final**

**Rule: ä:ö word final**

**Rule: a:0 in suaja:sai**
```
*  a _ (%{back%}:)  %^RmVow:  ;  Vowel shortening before subsequent "i"

* koira%^RmVow%>i%>en examples:*

* koir00%>i%>en examples:*

* koira0%>j%>en examples:*

* vahna%^RmVow%>in examples:*

* vahn00%>in examples:*
* *otta%{back%}%^WGStem%^RmVow%>in*
* *ot00000%>in*
```

## iToj between vowels
**Rule: i:j**

**%{ijPRC%}:i** 
```
*  a _ (%{back%}:)  %^RmVow:  ;  +ActPrsPrc
```

**Rule: a:o in the plural and preterite**
* *muama%{back%}%^A2O*
* *muamo00*

**a:e**  pidiä

* kanda%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{aäDiph%}s examples:*

* kanne00%>ttas examples:*

* kirjava%^E1%>m%^NONEb examples:*

* kirjave0%>m0b examples:*

**ä:e piettih and in comparatives**  pidiä
* *mečästä%{front%}%^E1%>tt%{aä%}s*
* *mečäste00%>ttäs*

**Rule: ä:0 pidiä:pidi**

**Rule: i:0 reboi:reboloi**
* *rodi%^RmVow%>i%>h*
* *rod00%>i%>h*

**%{oö%}:o** Vowel harmony suffixes Back
**%{oö%}:ö** Vowel harmony suffixes Front

**%{oöØ%}:0** Vowel harmony suffixes Back

**%{oöØ%}:o** Vowel harmony suffixes Back

* luge%>%{ijPRC%}%>%{oöØ%}%>i%>n examples:*

* lugi%>j%>o%>i%>s examples:*

**%{oöØ%}:ö** Vowel harmony suffixes Front

**%{uy%}:u** Vowel harmony suffixes Back
* *tul%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h*
* *tul%>luh*

**%{uy%}:y** Vowel harmony suffixes Front

## Consonant change

**Rule: g:j**
```
* *poiga%^WGStem%>n*
* *poija0%>n*
```

**Rule: g:v**
* *jog%{back%}e%^WGStem%>n*
* *jov0e0%>n*

* *jog%{back%}e%^WGStem%>n*
* *jov0e0%>n*

**g:l**  
* *sulga%^WGStem%>n*
* *sulla0%>n*
* *jalga%^A2O%>i%^WGStem%>s*
* *jallo0%>i0%>s*
sulgu+N+Pl+Ins **feather/sulka**
* *sulga%^RmVow%>i%^WGStem%>n*
* *sull0%>i0%>n*

**g:r**  
```

* särge%^WGStem%>n examples:*

* särre0%>n examples:*

* kergi%^WGStem%>t%{aäPar%} examples:*

* kerri0%>tä examples:*
```

**d:v**  
```
d:v <=> [ ö y: | o u: ] _ [ ä: | a ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ; 
          u a           _   o       (%{back%}:) %^WGStem:0 ; 
          a             _   u       (%{back%}:) %^WGStem:0 ; 
        [ u o: | u: ]   _  [ (%{back%}:) e | a: ]  (%{back%}:) ((%^RmVow:) %> i )    %^WGStem:0 ;  
        [ ä y: ]   _  [(%{front%}:) e | y ]  (%{front%}:) ((%^RmVow:) %> i )    %^WGStem:0 ;  
* *täydy%{front%}%^WGStem*
* *tävvy00*

```

**Rule: v:y**
**d:j**  
* *maido%^WGStem%>n*
* *maijo0%>n*
* *tiedo%^WGStem%>n*
* *tiijo0%>n*
* *tiedä%^WGStem%>n*
* *tiijä0%>n*

**Rule: y:v**

* täydy%^WGStem examples:*

* tävvy0 examples:*
lʼöydiä:lʼövvä

**Rule: u:v**
juodu+N+Pl+Ade
* *juoda%{back%}%^RmVow%>i%^WGStem%>l*
* *juod000%>i0%>l*
soudua:sovva

**o:v Lengthening with Ut:vv weakening**  
```
```

**d:z**  
* *vuod%^D2Z%>i*
* *vuoz0%>i*
* *tunde%^RmVow%>i*
* *tunz00%>i*

**d:t in partitive**  

* pagis%>d%{aä%}%^WGStemh examples:*

* pa0is%>ta0h examples:*

**Rule: s:z**
```
* s:z <=> _ (HarmDummy:) %^VOICE:0 ;  pestä: pezen
```

**k:g** pestä: peskäh

**rd:rr weakening**  

**ld:ll weakening**  

**nd:nn weakening** 
mennä+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: mennäh

* kanda%^WGStem%^E1%>tt%{aä%}s examples:*

* kanne00%>ttas examples:*

**rn:rr in prtprc**  

**ln:ll in prtprc**  
* *tul%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h*
* *tul%>luh*
ezitellä+V+Inf: **present/esitellä**
* *ezittel%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem*
* *ezi0tel00%>lä0*

**sn:ss in prtprc**  

**Rule: %{dtlnr%}:d**

**Rule: %{dtlnr%}:t**

**Rule: %{dtlnr%}:l**
tulla+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: tullah
* *tul%{back%}%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}*
* *tul0%>la*
kuvitella+V+Inf
* *kuvittel%{back%}%^WGStem%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}*
* *kuvi0tel00%>la*

**Rule: %{dtlnr%}:n**

**Rule: %{dtlnr%}:r**

### CONSONANT LOSS

**čToZero**  
```
* s:z <=> _ (HarmDummy:) %^VOICE:0 ;  suvaija:suvaičen
```

**kToZero**  aika: ajan
```
* *lʼykkä%{front%}%^WGStem%>t%{AÄ%}*
* *lʼy0kä00%>tä*
* *abuniekka%{back%}%^A2O%>i%>l*
* *abunie0ko00%>i%>l*
* *liikkeh%{front%}%^WGStem*
* *lii0keh00*

```

**gToZero**  aika: ajan
* *väge%{front%}%^WGStem>n*
* *vä0i00%>n*
* *pagis%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{dtlnr%}%{aä%}h*
* *pa0is000%>tah*

ezitellä+V+Inf: **present/esitellä**
* *ezittel%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{lnrs%}%{aä%}%^WGStem*
* *ezi0tel00%>lä0*

* tavoitteh%^WGStem examples:*

* tavoi0teh0 examples:*

* *kuul%>t%{aä%}%^WGStem*
* *kuul%>la0*

**b:v**  

**Rule: b:v**
```
b:m <=> m _ [ a | i ] (HarmDummy:) %^WGStem:0 ;
```

**p:0 in lapsi**  
* *kuoppa%{back%}%^WGStem%^RmVow%>i%>l*
* *kuo0p0000%>i%>l*

## Consonant loss
**d:0**   pidiä:piän

* pidä%^WGStem%>n examples:*

* pi0ä0%>n examples:*

**s:0**   

* bussa%^WGStem%>l examples:*

* bu0sa0%>l examples:*

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
